Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-640
Cancer and smoking disease research; department; adopt rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act to:

(1) Establish an application process for grants and contracts;

(2) Establish criteria for programs in order to receive funding;

(3) Establish criteria as to the rates and amount of funding; and

(4) Establish other procedures as necessary for the proper administration of sections 81-637 to 81-640.

Laws 1981, LB 506, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 738.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.